District of Columbia statutes.
41-141

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among those states enacting it.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 141, 27 DCR 5150

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-241.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 40 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).